Vermont, session 2025-2026, H848.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1856 is added to read:
§ 1856. NOTICE OF AND LIMITATIONS ON FACILITY FEES
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #386184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.848
2026 Page 2 of 3
(1) “Facility fee” means any fee charged or billed by a hospital or
hospital network for outpatient services provided by a hospital-owned or
hospital-affiliated facility that is:
(A) intended to compensate the hospital or hospital network for its
operational expenses; and
(B) separate and distinct from a professional fee.
(2) “Health care provider” has the same meaning as in section 9402 of
this title.
(3) “Hospital” has the same meaning as in section 9451 of this title.
(4) “Hospital network” has the same meaning as in section 9451 of this
title.
(5) “Hospital outpatient department” means a unit of a hospital, whether
on or off the main hospital campus, that is owned by or otherwise affiliated
with the hospital and is designed to treat patients who do not need to be
admitted to the hospital.
(6) “Professional fee” means any fee charged or billed by a health care
provider for professional medical services provided in a hospital-owned or
hospital-affiliated facility.
(7) “Telehealth” has the same meaning as in 26 V.S.A. § 3052.
(b) A hospital or hospital network shall not charge or collect a facility fee
for:
VT LEG #386184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.848
2026 Page 3 of 3
(1) health care services delivered in a hospital outpatient department, or
any other outpatient hospital services, that use a Current Procedural
Terminology (CPT) evaluation and management code or assessment and
management code; or
(2) health care services delivered through telehealth.
(c) A hospital shall provide a patient with notice in writing of any
applicable facility fees prior to delivering any health care service that will
result in the charge or collection of a facility fee.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386184 v.1